Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.285

Distribution of offering circulars authorized.

Any preliminary offering circular for the subscription offering, the public offering, or the direct community marketing which has been filed with the director may be distributed to eligible account holders or supplemental eligible account holders and to others in connection with the offering after the director has advised the applicant in writing that the application is properly executed and is not materially incomplete under RCW 32.32.265. No final offering circular may be distributed until the offering circular has been declared effective by the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 376; 1981 c 85 s 56.]